Louisiana, session 2026, HB76.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:715(C) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 15:549(J) and
715(D) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§549. Notification of release or escape of inmate
* * *
J.(1) The supervisor, or the person acting on behalf of the supervisor who is
physically present at and in charge of the correctional facility at the time it is
determined that an inmate has been improperly released from that facility, shall
immediately, or as soon as practicable, notify or take necessary steps to ensure that
notification of the improper release is provided to all of the following:
(a) The appropriate law enforcement agency.
(b) The victim of the crime for which the inmate was imprisoned.
(c) The district attorney.
(d) Local media outlets within the parish, at the discretion of the supervisor
or the person acting on behalf of the supervisor.
(2) The provisions of this Subsection apply to the improper release of an
inmate who has been detained or incarcerated on the basis of an arrest or conviction
for a crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B) that is a felony.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 76 ENROLLED
(3) As used in this Subsection, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(a) "Improper release" means the discharge of an inmate from a correctional
facility through circumstances that include but are not limited to administrative or
clerical error or mistake of staff.
(b) "Law enforcement agency" means the Department of Public Safety and
Corrections, office of public safety services and office of state police, and all police
departments in the parish.
(c) "Local media outlet" means a local news service, including but not
limited to a print, broadcast, or online platform.
(d) "Supervisor" means the warden, facility administrator, or designated
official at a correctional facility.
§715. Reporting of escapes or improper releases from parish prison facilities and or
jails
* * *
C.(1) The sheriff, the highest ranking employee of the sheriff's office, or the
person acting on behalf of the sheriff who is physically present at and in charge of
the parish prison or jail at the time it is determined that an inmate has been
improperly released from that facility, shall immediately, or as soon as practicable,
notify or take necessary steps to ensure that notification of the improper release is
provided to all of the following:
(a) The appropriate law enforcement agency.
(b) The victim of the crime for which the inmate was imprisoned.
(c) The district attorney.
(d) Local media outlets within the parish, at the discretion of the sheriff,
highest ranking employee of the sheriff's office, or the person acting on behalf of the
sheriff.
(2) The provisions of this Subsection apply to the improper release of an
inmate who has been detained or incarcerated on the basis of an arrest or conviction
for a crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B) that is a felony.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 76 ENROLLED
C. D. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Improper release" means the discharge of an inmate from a parish prison
or jail through circumstances that include but are not limited to administrative or
clerical error or mistake of staff.
(1) (2) "Law enforcement agency" means the Department of Public Safety
and Corrections, office of public safety services and office of state police, and all
police departments in the parish.
(2) (3) "Local media outlet" means a local news service, including but not
limited to a print, broadcast, or online platform.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.